apertium-cro.cro.mor.twol
Alphabet 

a ä b c d e ë f g h i j k l m n o ö p q r s š t u v w x y z ʼ ꞉

%»:0 
%>:0 ; 

Sets 

Vow = a ä e ë o ö i u ; 

Rules 

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ; 

"Remove clitic boundary"
%»:0 <=> _ ; 
